trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
    <pardef n="m/entir__vblex">
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiere</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiere</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiereis</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intieren</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intieres</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiese</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiese</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intieseis</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiesen</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intieses</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiéremos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>intiésemos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entid</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entid</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantad" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entida</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entidas</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entido</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entidos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entimos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entimos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entir</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entir</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiremos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entirá</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entirán</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entirás</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiré</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiréis</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiría</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiría</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiríais</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiríamos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entirían</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entirías</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entiste</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entisteis</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entí</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entí</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__oí" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entía</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entía</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entíais</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entíamos</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entían</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entías</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entíd</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantád" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entír</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantár" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>entís</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ienta</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ienta</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ienta</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ientan</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ientan</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ientas</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iente</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iente</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ienten</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ientes</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iento</l>
        <r>entir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>

      <e lm="consentir"><i>cons</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="presentir"><i>pres</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sentir"><i>s</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sentir hormigueo en las piernas" a="webform"><i>s</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>hormigueo<b/>en<b/>las<b/>piernas</l><r><g><b/>hormigueo<b/>en<b/>las<b/>piernas</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="desmentir" a="webform"><i>desm</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="mentir" a="webform"><i>m</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="asentir" a="eleka"><i>as</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="resentir" a="eleka"><i>res</i><par n="m/entir__vblex"/></e>
